src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"ö copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:ö <=> ö: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:)    _ [:ö|:i] ;
          ö: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:) :ö _    ;
          ö           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
          
"y copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:y <=> y: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:)    _ [:y|:i] ;
          y: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:) :y _    ;
          y           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
          
"u copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:u <=> u: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:)    _ [:u|:i] ;
          u: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:) :u _    ;
          u           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;




!! ###  Vowel harmony rule

!! All vowel harmony is taken care of with one rule.
	
"Back harmony"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
 Vx:Vy <=> BackVowel: NonFront:* (:NonFront) NonFront:* %> NonFront:* ([ NonFront: | :NonFront ]) NonFront:* (%>) NonFront:* _ ;  
         where Vx in ( %^A %^O %^U )
               Vy in (   a   o   u )
         matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ nais>i2lt^A
!!€ nais>ilta
!!€ puhu>^A
!!€ puhu>a
!!€ hinkka^WG>t^A
!!€ hink0a0>ta
!!$ katto^WG
!!$ katto0
!!€ keskus>t^A
!!€ keskus>ta	



! san0a>i2ss^A
! sanno>issa ! hmm
! san0a^HMETA>h^Vin
! sann00>hoin

! Test that deliberately fails.

!!€ a
!!€ b


!t:0 
!		  :e %> _ %^A: ; ! hanhea -- rather two classes
!        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ [l|n|r] _ Vow:+ WeakGrade ; ! imarela : imartelen
!       Vow:+ Cns:+ i t     _ Vow:+     WeakGrade ; ! esitellä
!       VowNotI (h)      _ [a|e|o|u] WeakGrade ; ! katu : kaun
!       VowNotI        t _ e: h %> e           ;
!      [VowNotI|l|n|r] t _ Vow:      WeakGrade ; ! motti Quant Grad. Note h!
